Louisiana, session 2026, HB30.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:2236 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2236. Employer retirement education; board certification
A. This Section applies to any municipality which employs, or may employ,
a municipal police officer, whether on a full-time or part-time basis, including any
municipality that has an elected chief of police, if the municipality's municipal police
officers are covered under the federal Social Security program, and the municipality
has not previously and specifically excluded its municipal police officers from
coverage under the federal Social Security program pursuant to applicable federal
law, regardless of whether the municipality is a participating employer.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-304 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 30
B.(1) The board of trustees shall develop and provide, at no cost to the
municipality, annual retirement education for each municipality subject to the
provisions of this Section.
(2) The education shall include, but is not limited to, the following:
(a) Employer participation requirements under this Chapter.
(b) Reporting and contribution obligations applicable upon participation in
the system.
(c) The interaction between the system and the federal Social Security
program.
(d) Deferred Retirement Option Plan participation and administration.
(e) Employer responsibilities related to employee classification, elections,
and service credit.
(f) Common compliance errors identified by the system.
(3) The board of trustees may provide the education through in-person or
virtual means.
C. Each municipality to which this Section applies shall ensure that the
following persons, at a minimum, complete at least one hour of the education
provided pursuant to this Section each calendar year:
(1) The chief executive officer or chief administrative officer of the
municipality, or a designee authorized by the chief executive officer.
(2) The municipality's payroll officer.
(3) The municipal chief of police, or a designee authorized by the chief of
police.
D.(1) On or before January thirty-first of each year, the board of trustees
shall determine whether each municipality subject to this Section has satisfied the
education requirements of this Section for the preceding calendar year.
(2) Upon making the determination required by Paragraph (1) of this
Subsection, the board of trustees shall certify each municipality as either compliant
or noncompliant.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-304 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 30
(3) The board shall provide written notice to each noncompliant municipality
on or before March first each year.
E.(1) A municipality determined by the board to be noncompliant shall have
sixty days from receipt of the notice provided pursuant to Subsection D of this
Section to achieve corrective compliance.
(2) Upon continued failure to comply after the corrective period, the board
of trustees may require one or more of the following administrative actions:
(a) Additional or remedial retirement education.
(b) Enhanced reporting or documentation requirements.
(c) Notation of noncompliance in the records of the system.
F. The board of trustees shall adopt rules in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act as necessary to implement the provisions of this
Section.